District of Columbia statutes.
1-306.39

Zoning regulations.

Nothing in this part shall supplant any requirement of the Zoning Regulations.

Apr. 10, 1984, D.C. Law 5-76, § 3, 31 DCR 1049
Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-275, § 2(a), 41 DCR 1499